New Jersey, session 222, S1315.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   (1)  A municipality may use an alternative living arrangement to address its fair share housing obligation by entering into an agreement with the provider of an alternative living arrangement or by granting preliminary approval to a developer of an alternative living arrangement. (2)  One unit of credit shall be provided for each low- and moderate-income resident of an alternative living arrangement. (3)  Controls on affordability on alternative living arrangements shall remain in effect for at least 10 years. b.    As used in this section, alternative living arrangement" means a structure in which residents share kitchen and plumbing facilities, central heat, and common areas. Alternative living arrangements include, but are not limited to: transitional facilities for the homeless, boarding homes regulated by the Department of Community Affairs; residential health care facilities regulated by the Department of Health; group homes for the developmentally disabled and mentally ill as licensed or regulated by the Department of Human Services; and congregate living arrangements. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.